Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 6 EXEMPTIONS FROM TAXATION
§ 63-602L. Property exempt from taxation — Intangible personal property.

The following intangible personal property is exempt from taxation: capital stock and bonds. The deposits in national banks, state banks, and savings and loan associations. Shares and accounts of savings and loan associations, credit unions or associations organized under the laws of the state of Idaho for the purpose of accumulating the savings and funds of their members and lending the same to their members. Goodwill, customer lists, contracts and contract rights, patents, trademarks, custom computer programs as defined in section 63-3616, Idaho Code, copyrights, trade secrets, franchises, licenses, rights-of-way which are possessory only and not accompanied by title.

The commission shall promulgate rules which shall provide for the exclusion of exempt intangible personal property from taxable value of operating property. Such rules shall allow each taxpayer the right to elect one (1) of the following three (3) methods for exclusion of exempt intangible personal property from its taxable value:

Separate exclusion of the exempt intangible personal property at the system level value; or

Separate exclusion of the exempt intangible personal property at the state allocated value; or

Exclusion of the exempt intangible personal property by valuation of only tangible personal property and nonexempt intangible personal property using valuation models which do not impound or include values of the exempt intangible personal property.

§ 63-602M. Property exempt from taxation — Certain secured dues and credits.

The following property is exempt from taxation: all dues and credits secured by mortgage, trust deed or other liens except as otherwise provided by law.

§ 63-602N. Property exempt from taxation — Irrigation water and structures — Certain property of irrigation districts or canal companies.

Water rights for the irrigation of lands are exempt from taxation.

Canals, ditches, pipelines, flumes, aqueducts, reservoirs, dams, and any other necessary facility used primarily for the conveyance, storage, or providing of water for the irrigation of lands, are exempt from taxation to the extent irrigation water is thereby conveyed, stored or diverted; provided that if any portion of such property is used for purposes other than irrigation of lands or the conveyance, storage, or providing of water to a nonprofit irrigation company or irrigation district, the assessor shall determine the entire value of such property so used and assess the proportionate part of such property that is devoted to such use.

All real and personal property is exempt that is owned, used, operated or occupied:

Primarily for the maintenance and operation of any irrigation project or irrigation works or system in conducting the business of furnishing water to landowners, members or shareholders; or

By any organization, whether incorporated or unincorporated, heretofore organized or which shall hereafter be organized, for the operation, maintenance, or management of an irrigation project or irrigation works or system and for the purpose of furnishing water to landowners, members or shareholders, the control of which is actually vested in those entitled to the use of the water from such irrigation works or system for the irrigation of lands to which the water from such irrigation works or system is appurtenant, including all title and interest in such property as owner, lessee, or otherwise.

Provided, that if any portion of such property is used for commercial purposes by others than its landowners, members or shareholders, the assessor shall determine the entire value of such portion of the property so used and assess the proportionate part of the property that is used for commercial purposes.

§ 63-602O. Property exempt from taxation — Property used for generating and delivering electrical power for irrigation or drainage purposes and property used for transmitting and delivering natural gas energy for irrigation or drainage purposes.

The following property is exempt from taxation: property used for generating or delivering electrical power to the extent that such property is used for furnishing power for pumping water for irrigation or drainage purposes on lands in the state of Idaho, and property used for transmitting or delivering natural gas energy to the extent that such property is used for furnishing natural gas energy for pumping water for irrigation or drainage purposes on lands in the state of Idaho. This exemption shall accrue to the benefit of the consumer of such power, or the consumer of such natural gas energy, except in cases where the water so pumped is sold or rented to irrigate lands, in which event the property used for generating or delivering power, and property used for transmitting or delivering natural gas energy, shall be assessed for taxation to the extent that such water is so sold or rented.

§ 63-602P. Property exempt from taxation — Facilities for water or air pollution control.

The following property is exempt from taxation: facilities, installations, machinery or equipment, attached or unattached to real property, and designed, installed and utilized in the elimination, control or prevention of water or air pollution, or, in event such facilities, installations, equipment or machinery shall also serve other beneficial purposes and uses, such portion of the assessed valuation thereof as may reasonably be calculated to be necessary for and devoted to elimination, control or prevention of water or air pollution. The state tax commission or county assessor shall determine such exempt portion, and shall not include as exempt any portion of any facilities which have value as the specific source of marketable byproducts.

If any water corporation, as defined by section 61-125, Idaho Code, regulated by the Idaho public utilities commission is or has been ordered by the state board of health [and welfare] or the Idaho public utilities commission to install equipment designed and utilized in the elimination, control or prevention of water pollution, the Idaho public utilities commission shall notify the Idaho state tax commission of the percentage such property bears to the total invested plant of the company and said portion shall be exempt from property taxation. Said percentage reported to the Idaho state tax commission by the Idaho public utilities commission may be contested by any person or party at a public hearing held before the Idaho state tax commission.

§ 63-602Q. Property exempt from taxation — Certain cooperative telephone lines.

The following property is exempt from taxation: cooperative telephone lines from which no profit is derived and upon or over which no fees or tolls are charged or collected. This exemption shall only apply to any cooperative telephone system having twenty-five (25) or less subscribers or users.

§ 63-602R. Property exempt from taxation — Agricultural crops.

The following property is exempt from property taxation: agricultural crops, whether growing or held for use or sale, while the legal or equitable title remains with the producer, and fruit and nut-bearing trees and grapevines; provided that nothing herein contained shall be construed to exempt timber, forest, forest land, or forest products from the provisions of chapter 17, title 63, Idaho Code.

§ 63-602S. Property exempt from taxation — Fruits and vegetables held for human consumption, and seeds, shipped out of the state.

Any person, firm or corporation engaged in the storing or processing of fruits or vegetables held for human consumption or shipment of seeds out of the state must file a full declaration of such property as of the assessment date with the county assessor. On any assessment made on fruits and vegetables held for sale for human consumption, or any processed product, thereof, or seeds, in the hands of farmers, producers, or of a processor, or while being transported to or held in storage in a public or private warehouse structure, the board of equalization of the county in which the assessment was made, at its meeting on the first Monday of December as provided by law for equalizing the assessments of personal property on the subsequent personal property assessment roll, shall cancel such assessments in whole or proportionate part on receipt of sufficient documentary proof that the personal property so assessed was actually sold and transported or shipped to another point outside the state of Idaho on or before December 1 of the current year of assessment. No such cancellation shall be made unless such proof be furnished to said board on or before such meeting in such year.

Public warehousing is the storing of personal property by any person, firm or corporation regularly engaged in the business of storing such property for hire.

Private warehousing is the storage of personal property by any person, firm or corporation which is carrying on the activity of warehousing or storing such property only in the operation of his or its own business.

This exemption shall only apply to private storage from and after a notice, describing by address and physical premises, is filed with the county assessor, which notice shall be filed annually.

§ 63-602T. Property exempt from taxation — Personal property manufactured or processed in this state and actually sold and shipped out of state.

Any person, firm, or corporation engaged in the manufacture or processing of personal property in this state which property is stored in a public or private warehouse structure or area must file a full declaration of such property as of the assessment date with the county assessor. On any assessment made on personal property manufactured or processed in this state by person [persons], firms or corporations having a domicile or place of business in Idaho, being stored in a public or private warehouse structure or area, the board of equalization of the county in which such assessment was made, at its meeting on the first Monday of December as provided by law for equalizing the assessments of personal property on the subsequent personal property assessment roll, shall cancel such assessments in whole or proportionate part on receipt of sufficient documentary proof that the personal property so assessed was actually sold and transported or shipped to another point outside the state of Idaho on or before December 1 of the current year of assessment. No such cancellation shall be made unless such proof be furnished to said board on or before such meeting in such year. The term “manufactured” or “processed” as used herein refers to personal property which has been fabricated, constructed, assembled, milled or converted into a finished product and is not intended to include any personal property undergoing a stage of manufacture or process prior to the end finished product.

Public warehousing is the storing of personal property by any person, firm or corporation regularly engaged in the business of storing such property for hire.

Private warehousing is the storage of personal property by any person, firm or corporation which is carrying on the activity of warehousing or storing such property only in the operation of his or its own business.

Private or public warehouse area is intended to mean for purposes of this act open storage or place properly identified which is normally used to store personal property by any person, firm or corporation.

This exemption shall only apply to a private warehouse, private and public warehousing area from and after a notice, describing by address and physical premises, is filed with the county assessor, which notice shall be filed annually.

§ 63-602U. Property exempt from taxation — Personal property shipped into the state and stored in a public or private warehouse structure, and designated for shipment out of the state to be considered in transit.

Personal property shipped into this state and stored in a public or private warehouse structure, which property is not offered for sale in Idaho and designated for reshipment outside of the state, is considered to be “in transit” and shall be exempt from taxation. Such property shall not be deprived of exemption because while in storage, awaiting such further shipment, such personal property is labeled, packaged, disassembled, divided, broken in bulk, relabeled, or repackaged, or because the personal property is held for resale to customers outside the state of Idaho. Provided that all personal property claimed to be exempt “in transit” be labeled as such and shall be designated immediately upon receipt as being in transit upon the books and records of the warehouse, whether public or private, wherein the same is located. The books and records of such storage warehouse shall contain a full, true and correct inventory of all such property, together with the date of receipt of same, the point of origin, the date of its withdrawal, and, if known, the ultimate destination thereof. The books and records pertaining to the storage of any such in transit property shall be opened to inspection by any taxing authority in the state of Idaho having jurisdiction thereof upon reasonable demand having been made.

Public warehousing is the storing of personal property by any person, firm or corporation regularly engaged in the business of storing such property for hire.

Private warehousing is the storage of personal property by any person, firm or corporation which is carrying on the activity of warehousing or storing such property only in the operation of his or its own business. This exemption shall only apply to private storage from and after a notice, describing by address and physical premises, is filed with the county assessor, which notice shall be filed annually.

§ 63-602V. Property exempt from taxation — Personal property shipped into the state and stored in the original package.

Personal property of any person, firm or corporation, having neither domicile nor place of business in this state, which property upon being brought or shipped into this state is forthwith stored in the original package in a warehouse operated for public use and for hire, shall, while so stored, be deemed in transit and shall be exempt from taxation.

§ 63-602W. Business inventory exempt from taxation — Business inventory that is a component of real property that is a single family dwelling.

The following property is exempt from property taxation: business inventory. For the purpose of this section, “business inventory” means all items of tangible personal property or other property, including site improvements, described as:

All livestock, fur-bearing animals, fish, fowl and bees.

All nursery stock, stock-in-trade, merchandise, products, finished or partly finished goods, raw materials, and all forest products subject to the provisions of chapter 17, title 63, Idaho Code, supplies, containers and other personal property that is held for sale or consumption in the ordinary course of the taxpayer’s manufacturing, farming, wholesale jobbing, or merchandising business.

Residential improvements never occupied. Once residential improvements are occupied as defined in section 63-317, Idaho Code, they shall be subject to the tax provided by section 63-317, Idaho Code. The provisions of section 63-602Y, Idaho Code, shall not apply to the exemption provided by this subsection. The exemption provided by this subsection applies only to improvements to real property, and only until first occupied. For purposes of this section, the term “residential improvements” means only:

Single family residences; or

Residential townhouses; or

Residential condominium units.

The nonresidential portion of an improvement to real property that is used or is to be used for residential and nonresidential purposes does not qualify for the exemption provided by this section. If an improvement contains multiple residential units, each such unit shall lose the exemption provided in this section when it becomes occupied.

§ 63-602X. Property exempt from taxation — Casualty loss.

The following property is exempt from taxation: real and personal property which has been damaged by an event causing casualty loss to all or a portion of the property. The board of equalization on a case-by-case basis shall determine whether to grant an exemption.

The county board of equalization shall decide whether to grant such claim for exemption on or before the second Monday of July of the year in which the claim is filed. If granted, either in whole or in part, the county board of equalization shall order all necessary adjustments made in the property roll.

An exemption granted under this section shall be for the year in which the real or personal property has been damaged or destroyed. Claimants seeking exemption under this section must apply to the county board of equalization. The application must be in writing on a form provided by the county and must identify the claimant, the date of the casualty loss, and the property that has been damaged or destroyed. The application must be filed on or before the end of the county’s normal business hours on the fourth Monday of June of the year in which the casualty loss occurred. If an exemption is granted, the value of the property subject to taxation shall be calculated by dividing the number of days in the year prior to the casualty loss by the number of days in the year and multiplying the resulting quotient by the market value of the property less any applicable exemptions, as of 12:01 a.m. on the first day of January of the tax year.

§ 63-602Y. Property exempt from taxation — Effect of change of status.

If any property, real or personal, which is exempted from taxation on the first day of January shall thereafter have a changed status during the year, either by change in ownership or otherwise, in a manner that if the changed status had existed on the first day of January the property would have been taxable at that time, then the property shall be assessed in the following manner: If the status changed before the first day of April, then for its full market value for assessment purposes; if on the first day of April and before the first day of July, then for three-fourths (3/4) of its full market value for assessment purposes; if on the first day of July and before the first day of October, then for one-half (1/2) of its full market value for assessment purposes; and if the status changed on or after the first day of October, then for one-fourth (1/4) of its full market value for assessment purposes. However, if the changed status results from the leasing or rental of property normally constituting business inventory, the same shall be subject to property tax only for the period it is so leased or rented and upon its return to business inventory shall again be exempt. Each owner of such property shall, on the first Monday of November of each year, file with the assessor for the home county of the owner with a copy for every other county involved, a statement listing and sufficiently identifying such property, the counties where it was situated and the periods of the preceding twelve (12) calendar months during which the property was leased or rented within each county.

At the time of filing such statement with the assessor of his home county, the owner of such leased or rented property shall provide such assessor with a copy for every other county involved.

The assessor of such home county shall ascertain the portion of said preceding twelve (12) calendar months during which such property was leased or rented in the home county and shall enter such property upon the subsequent or missed property roll and the tax collector of the home county shall compute and collect the property tax thereon. The assessor shall indorse the full market value for assessment purposes of each item of such property upon copies of the statement and the owner of the property shall, within five (5) days, furnish an indorsed copy of the owner’s statement to the assessor of each county of the state wherein such property was located during the lease or rental period, and each such other county assessor shall likewise assess and the tax collector shall collect the property taxes due for the portion of the preceding twelve (12) calendar months the leased or rented property was situate in their county.

The property taxes due thereon shall be a first and prior lien upon such property and all real and personal property of the owner thereof within the state until all property taxes due have been paid.

§ 63-602Z. Exemption from occupancy tax.

Any improvement to real property exempt from property taxation under the laws of this state or under the laws of the United States shall be exempt from occupancy taxation.

§ 63-602AA. Property exempt from taxation — Exceptional situations. — (1) The following property is exempt or partially exempt from taxation: real and personal property belonging to persons who, because of unusual circumstances that affect their ability to pay the property tax, should be relieved from paying all or part of said tax in order to avoid undue hardship, which undue hardship must be determined by the board of equalization.

(2) An exceptional value exemption granted under this section shall be for the current tax year only and property exempted hereunder shall continue to be listed and assessed for the ensuing tax years as other property.

(3) Claimants seeking exemption under this section must apply each year to the board of equalization and such claim must be submitted by the fourth Monday of June of the current year. The board of equalization must consider and act on all such claims no later than the second Monday of July.

(4) Each person claiming such exemption shall give a sworn statement containing full and complete information of his financial status to such board and shall make true answers to all questions propounded in writing, or otherwise, touching such person’s right to the exemption claimed. The chairman of the board shall have authority to administer oaths to each person appearing as a claimant for such exemption and, in addition to such examination, each claimant shall subscribe to and swear that his answers to questions propounded on written forms to be prescribed by the state tax commission are true, and which sworn statement shall be kept and filed by the clerk of the county board of equalization. The board may, in its discretion and for good cause shown, allow an agent or some person acting for and on behalf of the claimant to make the claim for exemption for any claimant in the manner herein provided, or where a person is unable to make such sworn statement, the person’s spouse, surviving spouse, guardian or personal representative, or other person having knowledge of the facts, may make such sworn statement in his stead.

(5) The county board of equalization shall decide and determine from each examination and from each written claim for exemption whether or not such person is entitled to the exemption claimed or to any part thereof, and shall make a record thereof accordingly.

§ 63-602BB. Partial exemption for remediated land. — (1) During the tax year 1997 and each year thereafter, a site as defined in section 39-7203, Idaho Code, and qualifying under chapter 72, title 39, Idaho Code, shall be eligible for property tax exemption not to exceed seven (7) years.

(2) “Remediated value” shall mean market value for assessment purposes of the land on January 1, less the market value for assessment purposes of the land on the January 1 prior to the year in which the remediation was completed.

(3) The exemption shall amount to fifty percent (50%) of the remediated land value. The exempted value assessed under this formula shall remain constant throughout the period of the exemption.

(4) The exemption allowed by this section may be granted only if:

The covenant not to sue as provided in section 39-7207, Idaho Code, remains in full force and effect for the entire period of exemption;

The site remains in the possession of the owner for the entire exemption period.

(5) The exemption allowed by this section may be rescinded if:

(a) The covenant not to sue as provided in section 39-7207, Idaho Code, is rescinded by the department;

(b) The site is transferred to a new owner.

(6) The owner need only make application for the exemption described in this section once over the course of the seven (7) year period.

(7) No owner of a site shall be granted the exemption provided in this section if said site has been:

(a) Previously granted the exemption provided in this section regardless of whether the entire seven (7) years of the exemption have been used;

(b) Denied by the department as a qualifying site pursuant to chapter 72, title 39, Idaho Code.

(8) The legislature declares this exemption to be necessary and just.

§ 63-602CC. Property exempt from taxation — Qualified equipment utilizing postconsumer waste or postindustrial waste. — (1) The following property is exempt from taxation: qualified equipment utilizing postconsumer waste or postindustrial waste used to manufacture products. This exemption shall be granted only if the list of all taxable personal property as described in section 63-302, Idaho Code, is submitted by the property owner or the agent thereof to the assessor not later than March 15 of each year. Additionally, the requirements of subsection (3) of this section shall be met.

(2) As used in this section:

“Postconsumer waste” or “postindustrial waste” means only those products and materials consisting of metals, paper, glass or plastic generated by businesses or consumers which have served their intended end use or usefulness and either have been or would normally be disposed of as solid waste except for the fact that they are separated from solid waste for purposes of collection, recycling or reuse. “Postconsumer waste” or “postindustrial waste” shall not include radioactive waste, as defined in subsection (4)(g) of section 63-3029D, Idaho Code, or hazardous waste, as defined in chapter 44, title 39, Idaho Code.

“Product” means any material resulting from a manufacturing process and offered for sale to the private or public sector which is composed of at least fifty percent (50%) postconsumer waste or postindustrial waste. “Product” does not include any shredded material unless such shredded material is incorporated directly into the manufacturing process.

“Qualified equipment” means machinery or equipment located within Idaho which has at least an estimated three (3) years useful life and at least ninety percent (90%) of the total actual production from the equipment during the previous calendar year utilized postconsumer waste or postindustrial waste. “Qualified equipment” shall not include any machinery or equipment which is used for the collection, as defined herein, of postconsumer waste or postindustrial waste. As used in this section “collection” means:

The acquisition of materials from businesses or the general public through purchase or donation, including the organization of systems for such acquisitions;

The preparation of materials for over-the-road transportation through cleaning, densification by shredding, baling, or any other method, or coalescence, including the organization of systems for such preparation; or

The transportation of postconsumer waste or postindustrial waste between separate geographical locations, including the movement of materials around the manufacturing site.

(3) On the list of taxable personal property required by subsection (1) of this section, the property owner, or agent thereof, shall identify all qualified equipment, and all machinery and equipment that does not meet the definitions of qualified equipment.

The property owner, or agent thereof, shall also report use of all qualified equipment, on forms prescribed by the state tax commission.

(4) The county assessor may request additional information of the company to verify the basis of the exemption claimed in this section.

(5) The legislature declares that this exemption is necessary and just.

§ 63-602DD. Manufactured homes used under a dealer’s plate or as a sheep and cow camp. — The following property is exempt from taxation: Manufactured homes that are:

Manufactured homes eligible to be used under a dealer’s license plate; or

Manufactured homes designated as sheep and cow camps.

§ 63-602EE. Property exempt from taxation — Certain tangible personal property. — The following property is exempt from taxation: class 2 property that is agricultural machinery and equipment and exclusively used in agriculture during the immediately preceding tax year. For purposes of this section:

“Agricultural machinery and equipment” shall mean any machinery and equipment that is used in:

Production or harvest of field crops including, but not limited to, grains, feed crops, fruits and vegetables, or the production of or caring for nursery stock as defined in section 22-2302, Idaho Code; or

The grazing, feeding or raising of livestock, fur-bearing animals, fish, fowl and bees, or harvest of their production, to be sold or used as part of a net profit-making agricultural enterprise or dairy.

“Harvest” shall include all activities necessary for a raw agricultural commodity to be put into its most basic salable form and shall also include on-farm storage of the commodity before it is first handled in the primary channels of trade.

Buildings shall not be considered to be agricultural machinery and equipment.

The provisions of this section shall be broadly interpreted in favor of granting the exemption.

§ 63-602FF. Partial exemption for parcels of land in a rural home site development plat. [Repealed.]

§ 63-602GG. Property exempt from taxation — Low-income housing owned by nonprofit organizations. — (1) As provided in this section, low-income housing owned by nonprofit organizations shall be exempt from taxation.

(2) In order to qualify as a nonprofit organization under this section, an organization must demonstrate that:

It is organized as a nonprofit corporation pursuant to chapter 30, title 30, Idaho Code, or pursuant to equivalent laws in the applicable state of incorporation; and

It has received an exemption from taxation from the internal revenue service pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and

No proceeds or tax benefits of the organization or from the low-income housing property owned by the organization shall inure to any individual or for-profit entity other than normal employee compensation.

(3) In order to qualify for the exemption provided in this section, the low-income housing property shall meet the following qualifications:

(a) Both legal and equitable title to the property is solely owned by the nonprofit organization seeking the exemption and is managed by the owner or a related nonprofit organization qualifying for the exemption set forth in section 63-602C, Idaho Code; and

(b) Tenants shall not be evicted based upon their inability to pay for a period of three (3) months if such inability is due to a catastrophic event that is not under the tenant’s control. For purposes of this subsection, “catastrophic event” means a medical condition or injury in which sudden, serious and unexpected symptoms of illness or injury are sufficiently severe to render the tenant unable to participate in employment and such illness or injury has been certified by one (1) or more licensed physicians and/or psychiatrists or psychologists. The term “catastrophic event” does not apply to individuals who voluntarily remove themselves from the workforce; and

(c) Except for a manager’s unit, all of the housing units in the low-income housing property are dedicated to low-income housing in the following manner: Fifty-five percent (55%) of the units shall be rented to those earning sixty percent (60%) or less of the median income for the county in which the housing is located; twenty percent (20%) of the units shall be rented to those earning fifty percent (50%) or less of the median income of the county in which the housing is located; and twenty-five percent (25%) of the units shall be rented to those earning thirty percent (30%) or less of the median income for the county in which the housing is located.

(4) The exemption provided in this section shall not apply:

(a) If the project is financed after the effective date of this act and applicable law permits the payment of property taxes with federal or state funds, grants, loans or subsidies; or

(b) If the property is receiving federal project-based assistance, as provided by 42 U.S.C. sections 1437f(d)(2), 1437f(f)(6) and 1437f(o)(13); or

(c) To any property used by a taxpayer to qualify for tax credits under the provisions of 26 U.S.C. chapter 42 or any successor programs until such time as the property is solely owned by a nonprofit organization as defined in this section and is no longer utilized to receive federal tax credits.

(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a low-income housing property shall be exempt from taxation due to undue hardship if:

(a) The property was financed prior to the effective date of this act; and

(b) Such financing was dependent upon the tax-exempt status of the property; and

(c) The law does not allow additional federal or state revenues to be available for the payment of property taxes.

(6) Nothing in this section shall affect the qualification of properties for tax-exempt status under other provisions of title 63, Idaho Code.

§ 63-602HH. Property exempt from taxation — Significant capital investments. — (1) The net taxable value of all property of a taxpayer in excess of eight hundred million dollars ($800,000,000) located within a single county in Idaho shall be exempt from property taxation and any special assessment.

(2) The property included in the calculation of the exemption set forth in this section shall include all real property owned, and all personal property owned, leased, or rented that would otherwise be subject to property tax; provided however, with respect to leased or rented personal property, only that portion of the property which a taxpayer is contractually liable for payment of property taxes thereon shall be included in the calculation of the exemption.

(3) Leased or rented personal property, included in the calculation of the exemption provided by this section shall not be assessable against the owner of such property.

(4) The exemption set forth in this section shall apply first to owned real and personal property and, if exhausted, shall then apply to leased or rented personal property.

(5) The taxpayer owning, leasing, or renting the property included in the calculation of the exemption shall designate the property to which the exemption applies.

(6) The exemption set forth in this section shall not be available to any taxpayer with respect to a given year who, in the immediately preceding calendar year, failed to make significant capital investments of at least twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), by the acquisition or improvement of real or personal property located within the county referred to in subsection (1) of this section.

(7) The exemption set forth in this section shall not be available to any taxpayer with respect to a given year who, as of the first day of such year, did not employ or engage on a regular full-time basis, or the equivalent thereof, at least one thousand five hundred (1,500) workers within the county referred to in subsection (1) of this section.

(8) Except for the exemption provided for in subsection (4) of section 63-3029B, Idaho Code, no other exemption from property tax or any special assessment provided by the statutes of this state shall be applicable to any property described in subsection (2) of this section with respect to a year in which the exemption set forth in subsection (1) of this section applies to any of the same property.

(9) Property exempted under this section shall not be included on any new construction roll prepared by the county assessor in accordance with section 63-301A, Idaho Code.

(10) The state tax commission shall adopt all rules that may be necessary to implement this section.

§ 63-602II. Property exempt from taxation — Unused infrastructure. — (1) It is the intent of this section to preserve infrastructure and encourage economic development in the limited circumstances when a business or other commercial entity ceases to operate on property within a county.

(2) Following notice as prescribed in section 31-710, Idaho Code, and public hearings, the board of county commissioners of any county shall have the authority to exempt from taxation the unused infrastructure of a business, provided that the business states that such infrastructure is nonoperational under penalty of perjury.

(3) The exemption shall be for a period of up to five (5) years, provided that the board of county commissioners may vote to extend the exemption for a period not exceeding five (5) additional years.

(4) The board of county commissioners shall publish in its minutes any decision to grant or deny the exemption provided in this section and shall notify the county assessor and state tax commission of any exemption and the duration of such exemption. It shall be the responsibility of the assessor to return the property valuation of the unused infrastructure to the tax rolls upon the expiration of the exemption.

(5) The exemption provided in this section shall not be granted for any portion of an operating public utility.

(6) As used in this section, “unused infrastructure” means installed utilities including, but not limited to, rail, water, natural gas and electrical lines.

§ 63-602JJ. Property exempt from taxation — Certain property of producer of electricity by means of wind, solar or geothermal energy. — Real estate, fixtures or personal property is exempt from taxation if it is:

Owned, controlled, operated or managed by an electrical or natural gas association or producer of electricity by means of wind energy, solar energy or geothermal energy, excluding entities that are regulated by the Idaho public utilities commission as to price;

Held or used in connection with or to facilitate the generation, transmission, distribution, delivery or measuring of electric power, natural gas or electrical energy generated, manufactured or produced by means of wind energy, solar energy or geothermal energy, and all conduits, ducts or other devices, materials, apparatus or property for containing, holding or carrying conductors used for the transmission, distribution and delivery of electric power, natural gas or electric energy generated, manufactured or produced by means of wind energy, solar energy or geothermal energy, including construction tools, materials and supplies; and

Subject to the taxes on gross wind, solar or geothermal energy earnings pursuant to chapter 35, title 63, Idaho Code.